Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4625
Disclaimer.

As provided by section 30-2352:

(1) A powerholder may renounce all or part of a power of appointment.

(2) A permissible appointee, appointee, or taker in default of appointment may renounce all or part of an interest in appointive property.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 48.